Utah statutes.
59-10-401.   Definitions.
For purposes of this part:
(1)  "Employee" means and includes every individual performing services for an
employer, either within or without, or both within or without the state of
Utah, or any individual performing services within the state of Utah, the
performance of which services constitutes, establishes, and determines the
relationship between the parties as that of employer and employee, and
includes offices of corporations, individuals, including elected officials,
performing services for the United States Government or any agency or
instrumentality thereof, or the state of Utah or any county, city,
municipality, or political subdivision thereof.
(2)  "Employer" means a person or organization transacting business in or
deriving any income from sources within the state of Utah for whom an
individual performs or performed any services, of whatever nature, and who has
control of the payment of wages for such services, or is the officer, agent,
or employee of the person or organization having control of the payment of
wages.  It includes any officer or department of state or federal government,
or any political subdivision or agency of the federal or state government, or
any city organized under a charter, or any political body not a subdivision or
agency of the state.
(3)  "Wages" means wages as defined in Section 3401 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
